apertium-cs-sl.cs.dix
    <pardef n="d/no__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>no</l><r>no<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>no</l><r>no<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>na</l><r>no<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>nu</l><r>no<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ně</l><r>no<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>nu</l><r>no<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>nem</l><r>no<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>no</l><r>no<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>na</l><r>no<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>na</l><r>no<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>en</l><r>no<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>num</l><r>no<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>nům</l><r>no<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>nech</l><r>no<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>nama</l><r>no<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ny</l><r>no<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>na</l><r>no<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="gi/o__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>o</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>o</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>u</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>u</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>em</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>o</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>um</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ům</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ech</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ama</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>y</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="t/elevize__n_f">
      <e><p>          <l>v</l><r>elevize<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="výdaj__n_m">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>e</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>i</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>i</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>em</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>i</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>e</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>e</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ův</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ů</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>um</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ům</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ích</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ema</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>i</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>e</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="žáč/ek__n_m">
      <e><p>          <l>ek</l><r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ka</l><r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ka</l><r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>kovi</l><r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ku</l><r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>kovi</l><r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ku</l><r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>kem</l><r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ku</l><r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ci</l><r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>kové</l><r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ky</l><r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ků</l><r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>kum</l><r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>kům</l><r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>cích</l><r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>kách</l><r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>kama</l><r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ky</l><r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ci</l><r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>kové</l><r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="poleno"><i>polen</i><par n="gi/o__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="plato"><i>plat</i><par n="gi/o__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="dno"><i>d</i><par n="d/no__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="měsíc"><i>měsíc</i><par n="výdaj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="okno"><i>ok</i><par n="d/no__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="pejsek"><i>pejs</i><par n="žáč/ek__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="potomek"><i>potom</i><par n="žáč/ek__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="právo"><i>práv</i><par n="gi/o__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="televize"><i>t</i><par n="t/elevize__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="těleso"><i>těles</i><par n="gi/o__n_nt"/></e>
